apertium-pan.pan.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ਅਆਇਈਉਊਏਐਓਔਕਚਟਤਪਯ੍ਸ਼ਰਫਥਠਛਖਗਘਙਖ਼ਗ਼ਞਝਜਠਛਠਡਢਣੜਲ਼ਨਧਦਬਭਮਫ਼ਜ਼ੵਵਲਰਸ਼ਸਹੑ਼ਾੀੂੈੌੋੁਿੰੱਁਂਃ੧੨੩੪੫੬੯੮੭੦☬ੴ॥।</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="post"    c="PostPosition"/>
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="pers"    c="Personal"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>     
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>        
    <sdef n="cnjun"   c="Undecided conjunction"/>        
    <sdef n="mf"      c="Both Genders"/>
    <sdef n="m"       c=""/>
    <sdef n="f"       c=""/>
    <sdef n="sg"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c=""/>

    <sdef n="nom"     c="Direct/Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="obl"     c="Oblique"/>
    <sdef n="dat"     c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="abl"     c="Ablative"/>
    <sdef n="voc"     c="Vocative"/>
    <sdef n="loc"     c="Locative"/>

    <sdef n="p1"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c=""/>
  
    <sdef n="ord"     c="ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="number/cardinal"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

    <!-- SECTION: Paradigms -->

	<!-- SECTION: Numerals -->

    <pardef n="ਚੁਰੰਜ੍ਹਵਾਂ__ord">
      <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਹਜ਼ਾਰਵਾਂ__ord">
      <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਆਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਆਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਪੰਦਰਾਂ__num">
      <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>੍ਹੀਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਸੌ__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਸੈਂਤੀ__num">
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>੍ਹੀਆਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>੍ਹੀਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਬਵੰਜਾ__num">
      <e><p><l>ਾ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>੍ਹਾਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>੍ਹੀਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->

    <pardef n="ਮੈਂ__prn">
      <e><p><l>ਮੈਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਮੈਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਮੈਨੂੰ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਅਸਾਨੂੰ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਮੈਥੋਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਸਾਨੂੰ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਅਸੀਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਅਸਾਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਮੇਰ/ਾ__prn">
      <e><p><l>ਾ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਿਆਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>ਿਆ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>ਿਓ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਮੇਰ/ੀ__prn">
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>ੀਏ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਆਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਆਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>ੀਓ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

<!--Second Person -->
    <pardef n="ਤੇਰ/ਾ__prn">
      <e><p><l>ਾ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਿਆਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਤੇਰ/ੀ__prn">
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਆਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਆਂ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਤੂੰ__prn">
      <e><p><l>ੂੰ</l><r>ਤ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੂੰ</l><r>ਤ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੁਸੀਂ</l><r>ਤ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੁਸਾਂ</l><r>ਤ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੈਥੋਂ</l><r>ਤ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੈਨੂੰ</l><r>ਤ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੁਹਾਨੂੰ</l><r>ਤ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੁਹਾਥੋਂ</l><r>ਤ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੈਂ</l><r>ਤ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੈਂ</l><r>ਤ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ਮੈਂ"><i></i><par n="ਮੈਂ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮੇਰਾ"><i>ਮੇਰ</i><par n="ਮੇਰ/ਾ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮੇਰੀ"><i>ਮੇਰ</i><par n="ਮੇਰ/ੀ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ਤੇਰਾ"><i>ਤੇਰ</i><par n="ਤੇਰ/ਾ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ਤੁਹਾਡਾ"><i>ਤੁਹਾਡ</i><par n="ਤੇਰ/ਾ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ਤੇਰੀ"><i>ਤੇਰ</i><par n="ਤੇਰ/ੀ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ਤੁਹਾਡੀ"><i>ਤੁਹਾਡ</i><par n="ਤੇਰ/ੀ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ਚੁਰੰਜ੍ਹਵਾਂ"><i>ਚੁਰੰਜ੍ਹਵ</i><par n="ਚੁਰੰਜ੍ਹਵਾਂ__ord"/></e>
    <e lm="ਹਜ਼ਾਰਵਾਂ"><i>ਹਜ਼ਾਰਵ</i><par n="ਹਜ਼ਾਰਵਾਂ__ord"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪੰਦਰਾਂ"><i>ਪੰਦਰ</i><par n="ਪੰਦਰਾਂ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸੌ"><i>ਸੌ</i><par n="ਸੌ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸੈਂਤੀ"><i>ਸੈਂਤ</i><par n="ਸੈਂਤੀ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ਬਵੰਜਾ"><i>ਬਵੰਜ</i><par n="ਬਵੰਜਾ__num"/></e>
